{"post-84901": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1536431119000", "message": "Welcome to Needle and Thread!Isra's new premiere shoppe for all your tailoring and fashion needs. Run and owned by the honorable Raelyn Fletcher, come in for a nice chat while getting fitted in clothes for any event. No appointments needed, most all walk ins accepted, get the dress of your dreams or the suit you're required to wear here. Prices are flexible and all types are welcome.\u00a0Have a nice visit!", "link_list": [], "image_list": ["https://i.pinimg.com/originals/a2/9b/5a/a29b5ac8f277cc187dc71c9b285947f7.jpg"], "html": "Welcome to Needle and Thread!"}, "post-84904": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1536435745000", "message": "Dixie wandered into the shop, clutching a folded blue dress. This definitely looked like the place that Robert had recommended. Who did he say the owner was, his sister? His cousin? His aunt? She couldn't recall, but they were definitely related in some way. As she made her way inside, wondered what she would tell the tailor. How would she explain the rip on her dress, which was very clearly torn open at the front of the bodice? Maybe she'd been attacked by some sort of savage animal? No, who would believe that? Maybe she had gotten it caught on something and it ripped...that was a little better. Perhaps she'd torn it when cleaning it...but it was awfully well-made, and didn't seem like the sort of thing to simply rip when being washed. She wished that she could have simply repaired it herself, but the dress was so finely made that she was afraid that it would be beyond her skills. Besides, Robert had simply insisted that she come here to have it fixed. Perhaps he wanted to support his relative's business.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie wandered into the shop, clutching a folded blue dress. This definitely looked like the place that Robert had recommended. Who did he say the owner was, his sister? His cousin? His aunt? She couldn't recall, but they were definitely related in some way. As she made her way inside, wondered what she would tell the tailor. How would she explain the rip on her dress, which was very clearly torn open at the front of the bodice? Maybe she'd been attacked by some sort of savage animal? No, who would believe that? Maybe she had gotten it caught on something and it ripped...that was a little better. Perhaps she'd torn it when cleaning it...but it was awfully well-made, and didn't seem like the sort of thing to simply rip when being washed. She wished that she could have simply repaired it herself, but the dress was so finely made that she was afraid that it would be beyond her skills. Besides, Robert had simply insisted that she come here to have it fixed. Perhaps he wanted to support his relative's business."}, "post-84906": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1536437365000", "message": "Raelyn looked up as she heard the bell attached to the front door of her little shop ring. \"Just a moment! I'll be right with you!\" She carefully set the box full of bolts of fine fabrics up on the shelf as she  dusted off her hands. It was her first day open to the public of this interesting city. She wasn't expecting anyone to stop by her shop but perhaps her cousins to check on her progress. She sighed as she checked her stock. Honestly, she would have been happy enough just working out of the little village that she had done her apprenticeship out of. But her master had, of course, insisted her skills would be better suited to the cityscape. Her cousin Robert had been more than happy to help her apply for a loan when she had sent him post. She repressed an eye roll as she made her way down the steps to the shop proper, hoping she wouldn't find her cousin there. It exhausted her to try and play nice with him all the time and fence with his silly pompous attitude. As she came down the steps and found a young lady standing there then, the warm smile on her face was genuine as she took her in. \"Hello there darling. I see you've managed to stumble into my little shop here. Can I help you with something?\" She asked as her eyes drifted down to the folded up bundle of fabric in her hands.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn looked up as she heard the bell attached to the front door of her little shop ring. \"Just a moment! I'll be right with you!\" She carefully set the box full of bolts of fine fabrics up on the shelf as she  dusted off her hands. "}, "post-84911": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1536442962000", "message": "Dixie smiled nervously at the friendly shopkeeper. The family resemblance was clear, although so much time near so many Fletchers had given Dixie the ability to pick out the little details that differentiated them all. This one's hair seemed to curl differently than Roxanne's, and had a somewhat similar facial structure to Robert.\"Hello...uh, Are you Raelyn? Robert suggested this place to me, it looks very nice. Do you...do you do repairs, by any chance? I've, um, torn my dress and would like to get it mended.\"She unfolded the dress sheepishly, revealing a long, finely-made blue gown. It looked to have been rather scandalously cut, but it was difficult to tell due to the fact that the front of the bodice had been very obviously torn open. Dixie blushed bright red, hesitating.\"I, uh...was wearing it and it got caught. On a tree. And it ripped. Can...can you fix it?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie smiled nervously at the friendly shopkeeper. The family resemblance was clear, although so much time near so many Fletchers had given Dixie the ability to pick out the little details that differentiated them all. This one's hair seemed to curl differently than Roxanne's, and had a somewhat similar facial structure to Robert."}, "post-84913": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1536444019000", "message": "Raelyn's sharp violet eyes skimmed over the dress critically but she paused when she heard Dixie's explanation for the damage to the dress. She cocked a brow at that. She didn't seem put off by the style of the dress, more so by the obvious lie.\"... You got caught... on a tree... and tore the dress that extensively?\" She asked slowly, disbelief clear in her voice and her face. She chuckled softly as she shook her head but still she held out her hand for the dress. \"You don't have to lie to me darling. I will see what I can do, though.\" She said reassuringly. \"It shouldn't take long if you'd like to have a seat and tell me the real reason.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn's sharp violet eyes skimmed over the dress critically but she paused when she heard Dixie's explanation for the damage to the dress. She cocked a brow at that. She didn't seem put off by the style of the dress, more so by the obvious lie."}, "post-84915": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1536445813000", "message": "Dixie sighed, handing Raelyn the dress to inspect. She sat down on the offered seat, unwilling to meet Raeyln's eye. She really should have fixed the dress at home, surely it couldn't have been that hard! But no, Robert had to insist that she support local businesses. He'd even promised to pay for it, but no amount of money could pay for the embarrassment.\"Well...let's just say it was Robert's fault. I'm sorry, I didn't introduce myself. I'm Dixie. Uh, have we met before? You look kind of familiar...I used to hang around with Roxanne a lot when we were younger, if you know her. Robert told me to come here, told me that you'd be able to fix it.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie sighed, handing Raelyn the dress to inspect. She sat down on the offered seat, unwilling to meet Raeyln's eye. She really should have fixed the dress at home, surely it couldn't have been that hard! But no, Robert had to insist that she support local businesses. He'd even promised to pay for it, but no amount of money could pay for the embarrassment."}, "post-84917": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1536447108000", "message": "As Raelyn took the dress from her, listening intently to her story, her brow first furrowed in confusion, then intrigue until finally her face smoothed with realization as she looked at her properly. \"... Little Dixie? Oh my stars it is you, isn't it? My goodness! It's been ages.\" She smiled again warmly as she carefully set the dress back down onto her work counter, to free up her arms to offer a hug to her. \"I'm so sorry I didn't recognize you, but you were quite young when we met and you have gotten so big. How have you been? I wouldn't have imagined you'd stay with that fuddy duddy Robert.\" She teased lightly.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Raelyn took the dress from her, listening intently to her story, her brow first furrowed in confusion, then intrigue until finally her face smoothed with realization as she looked at her properly. "}, "post-85018": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1536715889000", "message": "Dixie beamed, thrilled that Raelyn had recognized her. How long had it been since the woman had watched over her and Roxanne? Thirteen years, perhaps? Maybe fourteen? It seemed like a lifetime ago. She got up to embrace the tailor, squeezing the woman tightly.\"It's been so long! I've been fine, thank you. And Robert is wonderful! He brought me out to the city, out from the tavern in that little village. I love the city so much. I'm learning so many new things, meeting so many new people. There was never anything new back home, everything got stale. Out here though, it's all so different. It's exciting! Also, Roxanne lives here, although it seems like she's always on the road. It's always good to see her, though. So...what brought you to the big city?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie beamed, thrilled that Raelyn had recognized her. How long had it been since the woman had watched over her and Roxanne? Thirteen years, perhaps? Maybe fourteen? It seemed like a lifetime ago. She got up to embrace the tailor, squeezing the woman tightly."}, "post-85021": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1536754215000", "message": "Raelyn sighed softly as she pulled back from Dixie looking at her. She rubbed Dixie\u2019s upper arm lightly as she gave a rueful smile.\u201cTrust me, if it were up to me, I\u2019d stay in one of those \u2018stale little village\u2019.  It\u2019s quiet, safe, and easy to keep your head down. It\u2019s a good place to live- Especially for pretty girls like you.\u201d She teased her lightly as she pinched her cheek with warm worn fingers.After a moment though, her eyes grew a bit sad. \u201cUnfortunately, the woman I did my apprenticeship with had other ideas. She thought my talents would be wasted in a little town. In her last wishes, she pretty much demanded I leave her shop to her daughters and go off to the big city.\u201d As she let her go, she gave Dixie a resigned shrug. \u201cShe was good to me. As silly of a request it was, I couldn\u2019t deny her. So here I am today.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn sighed softly as she pulled back from Dixie looking at her. She rubbed Dixie\u2019s upper arm lightly as she gave a rueful smile."}, "post-85235": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1537340384000", "message": "Oh gods, the stress was killing him! Keph had a total of a single day to find a proper tailor to get him a proper suit for his date, a big issue with this is that he had no clue what a proper tailor was nor a proper suit! Hells, where did one even find a tailor to begin with? The city was huge and even though he had by now been walking around for the past half hour, he was yet to find anything!\u00a0The young man let out a heavy sigh and just as he was about to give up looking there and try a different part of Isra, he felt someone poking him on his shoulder. He turned around, to see what they wanted, and while oddly enough there was no one there, he did notice an interesting sign above a door; the \"Needle and Thread\", that sounded rather tailor-ish!\u00a0So far, he hadn't had much luck in finding what he needed, so seeing what might be exactly that, he didn't take a moment before approaching the door and checking to see if it was unlocked. A breath of relief left his lips as the door effortlessly moved and revealed a well-furnished room filled with a plethora of clothing.\u00a0He found two women inside, yet he didn't acknowledge them at first, instead just walking over to the counter and slamming his hand a few times on the bell, hoping to catch the attention of whichever of them was the owner of the store, and then promptly slipped a note onto the counter:\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": ["https://i.imgur.com/Io8uH7r.jpg"], "html": "Oh gods, the stress was killing him! Keph had a total of a single day to find a proper tailor to get him a proper suit for his date, a big issue with this is that he had no clue what a "}, "post-85243": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1537388994000", "message": "Dixie rolled her eyes as Raelyn pinched her cheek and teased her. So many people had told her to stay, but Robert's offer to bring her out here had been far too convincing. She was glad that she'd come out here, too.\"There's no sense in staying in a tiny little village and getting old and dusty, Raelyn. Sometimes you have to get out and experience new things. Who knows what sort of people you'll meet? When I left home, I never could have imagined any of the new acquaintances I've made.\"She giggled softly, wondering if Raelyn would believe her if she told her about the meeting with the Empress. Not that she would, of course. Dixie knew more than anyone else the importance of discretion in such matters. All of a sudden, she heard a violent ringing of a bell and glanced over at the front of the shop. A tiny young man had walked in, little more than a boy. Dixie smiled at him, waving. The boy was awfully adorable, almost like a little rabbit. Who knew someone so small could be so cute?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie rolled her eyes as Raelyn pinched her cheek and teased her. So many people had told her to stay, but Robert's offer to bring her out here had been far too convincing. She was glad that she'd come out here, too."}, "post-85251": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1537417626000", "message": "Raelyn rolled her eyes about to respond to Dixie when the violent ringing of her counter bell cut her off. She blinked twice before she followed Dixie's glance to the front of her store, a disapproving stare already in place. \"Yes, some rather interesting people...\" Raelyn muttered as her eyebrow twitched and she pat Dixie on the shoulder, whispering that she'd be right back, moving past her to deal with the sudden guest. Another reason for her distaste of the city. No one taught their children manners in these parts. She reached forward quickly and took the bell off the table, resting her hand on her hip, ignoring the note for the time being. The child's mother or employer could wait a few minutes longer.\u00a0\"Good morning, sweetheart. I'd appreciate if you didn't break my bell the first day it's out here trying to get my attention like dog. And if you have a request, a greeting, an introduction, and a please is usually nice before demanding what you want, right? I'd think your mother would have taught you proper manners when asking someone for something, isn't that also right?\" She questioned, the disapproving look still in her eyes as she looked at the young man-boy. Her hands still rested on her hips waiting for at the very least an apology.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn rolled her eyes about to respond to Dixie when the violent ringing of her counter bell cut her off. She blinked twice before she followed Dixie's glance to the front of her store, a disapproving stare already in place. "}, "post-85265": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1537514717000", "message": "Keph stared at the woman with a perked brow, before rebelliously tapping the bell once more, and then immediately tapping at the page of parchment he had placed on the counter! Did she not notice that it had the Empress' signature? For some reason, Keph had made the odd assumption that all citizens of Isra - including this tailor - would quickly identify the signature and accept it as real, even though he himself wasn't aware of who Isra's leader was until recently.\u00a0Of course, Keph being Keph, a single rebellious act was not going to be enough; he promptly\u00a0dug into his bag, pulling a notebook from it and pulling the quill out of the bottle of ink that was conveniently\u00a0tied to the outside of his satchel. Quill was put to parchment, his hand moving quickly, fluently, and in a brief moment, he had a message to give the nasty tailor! He turned the opened notebook towards the woman that stood behind the counter, on it was written:\u00a0\"If the bell were to break so easily, he'd recommend she find a better blacksmith. Keph apologizes for his inability to speak verbally, as clearly, it is an issue of such magnitude that him using the only available device to catch her attention is enough to cause her great stress! Keph was clearly in the wrong he, as a mute, should've simply given her a friendly greeting and then she could proceed, as she is now, in treating a customer as an idiotic child.\"He held the notebook up, over the lower half of his face, with his right hand, while his two, unamused-looking eyes right above it continued to stare right at her, his left hand, in the meanwhile, continued to tap the page he had left on her counter.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph stared at the woman with a perked brow, before rebelliously tapping the bell once more, and then immediately tapping at the page of parchment he had placed on the counter! Did she not notice that it had the "}, "post-85267": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1537548267000", "message": "Raelyn\u2019s quirked as she watched the small man huff and puff before scribbling out his message on the journal. She leaned down to read his message carefully before she sighed staying lowered to the ground. The regret at not staying in her tiny village where everyone knew everyone and she could easily find this man\u2019s mother or wife to scold him, resurged.\u201cWell then. I will say that I am sorry for not knowing on sight that you were mute. But the problem here is, while you are mute, I am not deaf. I have a bell that rings when you enter my shop. And one ring of this little bell would have gotten my attention well enough.\u201d She explained slowly, giving him a bland look. \u201cAs well as I was just in the middle of a conversation with another customer. So you were not only rude to just me when you here asking for me to do something for you, but also her.\u201d She neglected to mention that Dixie was an old friend and probably didn\u2019t mind to begin with. \u201cWhen you behave like an impertinent child, people will treat you like an impertinent child-regardless of how old you actually are. So, before I consider your request, would you mind just humoring me for a bit and actually conduct yourself as an adult with manners and apologize?\u201dRaelyn gave him a smile then her brows slightly arched expectantly. She wasn\u2019t condescending in the slightest as she spoke and she didn\u2019t raise her voice above her normal tongue. She was speaking rationally.She planned on running her shop in the manner she chose. Just because she was no longer in her village, it didn\u2019t mean she couldn\u2019t have this as her small part of home.She was well aware that it may not work perfectly especially because from the corner of her eye she could see the ornate seal pressed into the paper the young man was pushing, but she didn\u2019t care. She wouldn\u2019t be pushed around. Even if she was dealing with a lord, lady- stars above- even if it was the empress herself.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn\u2019s quirked as she watched the small man huff and puff before scribbling out his message on the journal. She leaned down to read his message carefully before she sighed staying lowered to the ground. "}, "post-85294": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1537756307000", "message": "Keph cocked his head as the tailor appeared, to him, to be making a fairly big deal out of something as simple as him ringing that bell multiple times, on top of that, who in their right mind would only ring a bell once? It'd be like getting your hands on a flute simply to only play a single note!\u00a0The young man leaned a tad to the side, looking past the taller woman to the 'customer' that too found herself in the store, then gave her a quick wave and a slight smile - she looked nice enough, there was no point for the tailor to be pulling that poor woman into their disagreement!\u00a0He looked agasp as she called him an impertinent child! Why the nerve! He was a valiant adventurer, the best there was! Besides, who was she to talk?! There she was, treating him in a fashion that was insulting - or at least a way Keph thought of as insulting. He crossed his arms and let out a 'hmph!', clearly he was dissatisfied with how he was being treated! Gods, city folk were truly the worst, if he were back home, he'd probably gotten a free mackerel just for shopping at a fish stand, yet here, in Isra, he apparently had to fight his way just to get past the shopkeeper!Clearly, this was a horrid woman that he was dealing with! Young Keph rose his hand... before planting it once on the bell, carefully, so only a soft 'ding' would sound out. He supposed\u00a0that if she was going to act this way he might as well be the bigger man, and while it wasn't a written apology, it was an apology of sort for how he used her bell, earlier.\u00a0\"Can he get his clothing now?\" Said the note he had just hastily written and held up.He kept his arms crossed, eyes looking slightly away from the woman, he was still rather annoyed with how she had addressed him, but he was willing to do his best to ignore it and carry on.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph cocked his head as the tailor appeared, to him, to be making a fairly big deal out of something as simple as him ringing that bell multiple times, on top of that, who in their right mind would only ring a bell once? It'd be like getting your hands on a flute simply to only play a single note!\u00a0"}, "post-85295": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1537757035000", "message": "Dixie sat back and waited as Raelyn went to tend to the impolite young customer, but found herself perplexed by the one-sided conversation. What was going on, was the boy simply very quiet? Looking over, she saw the boy holding up some sort of note, and got up to investigate. So he was mute...that was interesting. As she stepped over towards Raelyn, she spotted the note on the counter and frowned. The Empress' personal seal...how did he have that? Who was he, that the empress herself was dressing him on her bill? She didn't even get her clothes on the imperial bill! She frowned, annoyed, before composing herself. There had to be some explanation, she had to get to the bottom of this. Stepping up beside Raeyln, she rested her elbows on the counter and leaned over (perhaps unnecessarily far) towards the boy.\"Tell me...who are you? What sort of man are you, little 'Keph'? Who are you to have caught the eye of the empress herself? How is it that you can walk in here and demand to be dressed in the finest on her bill?\u00a0How is that possible? What did you do for her? Are you some great hero, perhaps? Maybe a mighty dragonslayer?\"She smirked at Keph, wondering if the boy would be able to meet her eye. Somehow, she doubted it. He seemed so young, even younger than her. How was it that he'd gained Naoki's favor, while she was paying for her tailor work out of her own pocket? It wasn't fair. Who was\u00a0this kid, anyway? He was awfully small, and didn't look to be much of anything. What sort of secrets did he hold?\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie sat back and waited as Raelyn went to tend to the impolite young customer, but found herself perplexed by the one-sided conversation. What was going on, was the boy simply very quiet? Looking over, she saw the boy holding up some sort of note, and got up to investigate. So he was mute...that was interesting. As she stepped over towards Raelyn, she spotted the note on the counter and frowned. The Empress' personal seal...how did he have that? Who was he, that the empress herself was dressing him on her bill? She didn't even get her clothes on the imperial bill! She frowned, annoyed, before composing herself. There had to be some explanation, she had to get to the bottom of this. Stepping up beside Raeyln, she rested her elbows on the counter and leaned over (perhaps unnecessarily far) towards the boy."}, "post-85373": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1538099054000", "message": "Raelyn closed her eyes as she breathed out a heavy exhale, coming to terms with the fact, that was probably the best she would get from the young man. She wasn't exactly satisfied, but the quicker she finished his job, the quicker he'd be out of her shop. She was about to invite the young man upstairs when Dixie cut in, interrupting them. Her eyes opened and her brow slowly inched upwards on her face at Dixie's questioning and prodding. But more so at her rather... compromising position in front of the young man. She tactfully avoided looking down as she stepped forward and tapped Dixie on the tip of her nose as she had done when she was younger to lightly scold her. \"Dixie. Behave now. He's obviously in a bit of a hurry, so lets get you measured out, get some idea of what exactly you want and then I can go back to your dress and you can cross examine him all that you like.\" She said as she reached into her apron pocket to pull out the measuring tape. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn closed her eyes as she breathed out a heavy exhale, coming to terms with the fact, that was probably the best she would get from the young man. She wasn't exactly satisfied, but the quicker she finished his job, the quicker he'd be out of her shop. "}, "post-85435": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1538273488000", "message": "Keph had hoped that resolving things with the tailor would've allowed him to just get in his clothing in peace and without further incident, but apparently, this just wasn't one of his luckier days. The customer that he had briefly waved at just moments ago and looked nice enough turned out to perhaps be even worse than the tailor had seemed to him when she first addressed him. Here he was, a simple, young man - well, perhaps a young man of infinite talent and skill, but a simple one none the less - yet he couldn't just go to a business and get his clothing without everyone wanting to get in his way! Now, all of a sudden, he was getting accosted!\u00a0The young man perked a brow at the woman, who leaned over the counter to the point of partially exposing her bust to him, now while he wasn't complaining, he wasn't one to just back down because it was a woman confronting him, even if that woman had a chest large enough to cause back problems.\u00a0He raised his hand, delivering a light tap on her forehead with his palm, it wasn't any more painful than a slight pinch, but it'd annoy most people - granted, it's not like she didn't deserve it! Who was she to randomly begin asking him personal questions? Why did it matter to her? He would've probably written a particularly long message hitting her where it hurts (that being her looks), but luckily the tailor stepped in.\u00a0He pinched the bridge of his nose and exhaled - deep breaths now, Keph! With that having seemingly been resolved without much issue, he gave the tailor a thumbs up. He was in a bit of hurry and she looked like she was enough of a professional to get down to business without letting all this personal business get too much in the way.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph had hoped that resolving things with the tailor would've allowed him to just get in his clothing in peace and without further incident, but apparently, this just wasn't one of his luckier days. The customer that he had briefly waved at just moments ago and looked nice enough turned out to perhaps be even worse than the tailor had seemed to him when she first addressed him. Here he was, a simple, young man - well, perhaps a young man of infinite talent and skill, but a simple one none the less - yet he couldn't just go to a business and get his clothing without everyone wanting to get in his way! Now, all of a sudden, he was getting accosted!\u00a0"}, "post-85440": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1538275274000", "message": "Raelyn sighed again as she put her hand behind the man's shoulders and steered him back around the counter, towards the steps to the room where she wold start her work. She was eager to get the boy out of Dixie's reach before anything else unfortunate could happen. The last thing she needed was to pull an enraged Dixie off the strange, rude, little brat. \"Dixie, sweet heart, you just sit down here, help yourself to some tea, and I'll be down soon after everything is set!\" She called over her shoulder as she nudged the young man up the stairs before she quickly hurried up herself. The room upstairs was probably her favorite in the little shop. There was a small stage for the customer to step up to where she could easily get their measurements, but that was not the best part. The walls around the stage were lined with floor length mirrors at every angle so the client could easily see what they looked like and appreciate the fit. Also there were mannequins with some of her recently finished works between the mirrors, the ornate stitching and quality of fabrics obvious even at a quick glance. \"Well, if you'll take off that cloak and step up on the stage for me, we can get started with your measurements. From there we can discuss if you want an original piece, or you'd like for me to alter something to fit you. An original will take me longer to do and with the apparent rush you're in, I'm not sure if it would be possible.\" She said as she walked away to grab her book to make notes in. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn sighed again as she put her hand behind the man's shoulders and steered him back around the counter, towards the steps to the room where she wold start her work. She was eager to get the boy out of Dixie's reach before anything else unfortunate could happen. The last thing she needed was to pull an enraged Dixie off the strange, rude, little brat. "}, "post-85512": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1538438045000", "message": "Dixie frowned, somewhat miffed at Raelyn's poke and chiding. She didn't like being told to behave, as that implied that she was misbehaving. Did Raelyn think she was still a kid? Who was she, to scold her like she was her mother? However, the mild slight was nothing compared to the affront of Keph pushing her away. She gasped, and would have raised her hand to slap him if Raelyn hadn't pulled him away. Who did he think he was? How dare\u00a0he touch her, much less shove her away? She glared at the boy, wanting nothing more than to smack him in his smug little face. How could anyone be so rude? The shock and sudden rage left her just as speechless as he was.Raelyn's attempts to mollify her did little to calm her down. Dixie seethed as she stepped back from the counter, whispering \"You'll get what's coming to you, boy,\" before turning and walking over to where she'd been sitting before. She poured herself a mug of tea, still watching Raelyn and Keph they walked up the stairs. Dixie was sweet, but she had a short\u00a0temper, and she was very capable of holding a grudge.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie frowned, somewhat miffed at Raelyn's poke and chiding. She didn't like being told to "}, "post-85574": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1538709258000", "message": "Keph yelped in surprise as the tailor suddenly grabbed his shoulders and steered him clear of the obnoxious customer that had been prodding him for personal information. Although it was a bit annoying to be dragged away in such a way, he didn't mind it too much considering it not only got him away from that weird lady, but it also meant he was finally getting what he had come from!\u00a0The room he was brought into was nice and cozy, although he did find it a tad too ornate for his liking, he personally preferred a humbler, more rustic look to things, but the store was hers after all. He nodded at the tailor's request, removing his cloak and throwing it onto a nearby mannequin, along with a plethora of other pieces of equipment that adorned him and would've made Raelyn's life quite difficult.\u00a0\"Keph would rather not have an original piece, he's not quite sure what he even wants - he is apparently not a very fashionable person.\" The young man producing yet another message for Raelyn; he liked his wear, but seeing as the Empress had not, he could only assume city folk had a different taste when it came to style.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph yelped in surprise as the tailor suddenly grabbed his shoulders and steered him clear of the obnoxious customer that had been prodding him for personal information. Although it was a bit annoying to be dragged away in such a way, he didn't mind it too much considering it not only got him away from that weird lady, but it also meant he was finally getting what he had come from!\u00a0"}, "post-85585": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1538772202000", "message": "Raelyn hummed at that as she read what he wrote again and helped Keph up to the stage so she could start measuring him. \"Well, that's quite alright. I suppose that's my job to figure out what would be in style for you.\" She said as she sized him up briefly with her eyes before she began to measure him. She took her tape measure and took the length of his shoulders, before whispering a word under her breath and taking her hands away. The tape measure remained a float as Raelyn took out her notebook and started writing down the measurements. The enchanted ruler moved along his body at her command, freeing up her hands to do write and sketch. It really was a handy gift that her previous mentor had left for her. \"Do you have any idea of what you might want though? What type of event is it for? Do you need a full suit, a doublet, a tunic, a tux- what would you feel most comfortable in? Flashier or simpler?\" She asked as she guided his arms up into a position which the tape measure could get the length of both of his arms.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn hummed at that as she read what he wrote again and helped Keph up to the stage so she could start measuring him. \"Well, that's quite alright. I suppose that's my job to figure out what would be in style for you.\" She said as she sized him up briefly with her eyes before she began to measure him. She took her tape measure and took the length of his shoulders, before whispering a word under her breath and taking her hands away. "}, "post-85663": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1539057457000", "message": "Keph stretched his arms out while watching Raelyn work with an air of curiosity, albeit with a bit of discomfort in the mix, as well. So this is what she did for a living, measure people and then just get cloth of around the same size? It didn't sound so difficult. The sight of the enchanted tape moving and taking measurements on its own stunned Keph and ripped him away from his thought bubble - now that, that was a neat trick.\u00a0His amazement was cut short by Raelyn's queries and gave her an uncertain glare; the young man again resorted to his notebook to answer:\"It's for a date with the Empress. Keph has never been on a date with a Monarch so he isn't quite sure what one is meant to dress.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph stretched his arms out while watching Raelyn work with an air of curiosity, albeit with a bit of discomfort in the mix, as well. So this is what she did for a living, measure people and then just get cloth of around the same size? It didn't sound so difficult. The sight of the enchanted tape moving and taking measurements on its own stunned Keph and ripped him away from his thought bubble - now that, that was a neat trick.\u00a0"}, "post-85709": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1539299613000", "message": "Raelyn turned to read the note over his shoulder before she tsked softly and came around to look at him. Inwardly, she was a bit shocked to learn the young man was having a date with the empress, but she didnt comment oj it. She was just a simple tailor after all.Raelyn  set her hands on her hips as she studied him closely before she spoke. \u201cWell, lets see what I can do with that then.\u201d She turned then and walked to the back hidden room searching through the closet of half finished clothes. She first selected some rather simple trousers she knew would complement his small size. She wandered about until she found what she was looking for. She carefully picked out and fine black dress shirt which had silver stitching on the corners of the collar and some slight accents. She also pulled out a vest of a similar design and material that had silver buttons with sapphires imbedded in the button. They would likely bring out the blue in his eyes and look good with his conplexion. To give him another option, she pulled out a maroon doublet held together with gold buttons set with rubies. There was a intricate yet subtle design to the jacket. Both had simple designs but oozed subtly with their refined nature. Those were what she would start with.With the clothes carefully tucked over her arm, she walked out back to Keph. \u201cWhat do you think of these?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn turned to read the note over his shoulder before she tsked softly and came around to look at him. Inwardly, she was a bit shocked to learn the young man was having a date with the empress, but she didnt comment oj it. She was just a simple tailor after all."}, "post-85803": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1539643739000", "message": "Keph watched as the tailor wandered about the room, picking up different pieces of clothing before finally presenting them to him. He crossed his arms and held his chin in a thoughtful manner, eyes glazing over both of them... was this really what nobles liked wearing? Both of them looked fairly tight, his own clothing was a tad baggy which allowed them to be comfortable and give him as much mobility as he needed! How in the Hels was one suppose to climb up a tree to avoid a pack of wolves in that?! Sure, you wouldn't really find wolves in Isra - or at least he hoped not - but he really doubted there weren't several situations in which baggier, more utilitarian clothing wouldn't do far better.The young man pinched the bridge of his nose, sighing loudly. As much as he was not a big fan of all this, he did need something that suited this whole fashion hogwash, so he might as well choose something. He'd end up pointing at the dress shirt and the vest, it looked less constrictive than whatever that other piece of hellish clothing was, and he couldn't say the silver lining didn't catch his eye, for some reason it reminded him of the snow back home - maybe that meant it might go well with his hair?\"Keph will choose that one.\" He held up the note with one hand while pointing with the other.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph watched as the tailor wandered about the room, picking up different pieces of clothing before finally presenting them to him. He crossed his arms and held his chin in a thoughtful manner, eyes glazing over both of them... "}, "post-85806": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1539648753000", "message": "Raelyn looked relieved as she set aside the other outfit carefully. \"Good eye. I think this one will suit you better as well. But it's best to let the client choose.\" She hummed as she moved back over to his side and set the selected clothing on the bench as she picked up her notebook again. \"Now, as for the fit. We will test them as they are right now and I can, of course, make some alterations and adjust things as necessary because they weren't intended for a man of your stature. However, I'd like to know your preference. Do you prefer a looser fit or would you like everything to fit snugly? If you don't mind my input, snug might be better. Especially if you are going for a date. Though I'm not sure how you city folk do it.\" She mused, an easy smile on her face as she held out her hand and the tape measure flicked back to her, wrapping around her wrist.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn looked relieved as she set aside the other outfit carefully. \"Good eye. I think this one will suit you better as well. But it's best to let the client choose.\" She hummed as she moved back over to his side and set the selected clothing on the bench as she picked up her notebook again. "}, "post-85832": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1539834769000", "message": "Keph cocked his head at her assessment\u00a0of him, before looking down at himself with uncertainty; did he actually look like city folk?\u00a0\"Keph isn't from Isra, he's from a small fishing village. He'd rather take a looser fit, but if she thinks a tighter fit is best, he'll go with such.\" He held the note over the lower half of his face, hiding his mouth from view until the notebook was again lowered for any other responses that needed to be written.After all, apparently that's what looked good - it definitely didn't feel good being in an overly constrictive uniform, but he wasn't the one making the rules here.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph cocked his head at her assessment\u00a0of him, before looking down at himself with uncertainty; did he actually look like city folk?\u00a0"}, "post-85880": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1539984838000", "message": "Raelyn blinked at that in surprise as she read his response. Such a spoiled child wasn't from the city?  \"Oh... that's actually surprising. Considering how you act I would have never... Well... never mind. I apologize for making a hasty judgement of you.\" She gave a small awkward chuckle while making a mental note to herself not judge people as they may appear. It was an obvious thing to do but she'd somehow forgotten it. She shifted the clothing on her arm before she offered it to him and gestured to a folding screen in the other corner of the room. \"If you wouldn't mind, could you try these on first so I get an idea of the alterations I need to make? And then I'll have it ready for you, realistically by tomorrow.\" She said as she offered him a hand to step down from the stage.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn blinked at that in surprise as she read his response. Such a spoiled child wasn't from the city?  \"Oh... that's actually surprising. Considering how you act I would have never... Well... never mind. I apologize for making a hasty judgement of you.\" She gave a small awkward chuckle while making a mental note to herself not judge people as they may appear. It was an obvious thing to do but she'd somehow forgotten it. She shifted the clothing on her arm before she offered it to him and gestured to a folding screen in the other corner of the room. "}, "post-86058": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1540424781000", "message": "Keph lightly cocked his head, staring at the tailor with a raised brow - what about how he acted would make him from Isra? He didn't believe he look nor acted like any of the cityfolk. Yet, the young man thought little of it and just shrugged the comment off without making anything of it.\u00a0The young man stepped off the stage and towards her, not really needing to take her hand. He took the folded clothing off of her arm, before stepping back and stripping down to his undergarments, before dressing back up in the given pieces. After such, Keph spun in place before taking a few steps around, he looked down at himself, then looked back over his shoulder - it definitely felt odd to be out of his usual wear.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph lightly cocked his head, staring at the tailor with a raised brow - what about how he acted would make him from Isra? He didn't believe he look nor acted like any of the cityfolk. Yet, the young man thought little of it and just shrugged the comment off without making anything of it.\u00a0"}, "post-86150": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1540531837000", "message": "Raelyn walked away as he went to change and grabbed her pin cushion, strapping it onto her wrist carefully, making sure she had enough on hand. She stuck her notebook that was marked on Keph's clientele page into her apron for easy access. She turned around just as he walked out of the changing area and she gave a proud smile. She did have a good eye for these things. Which she supposed was important considering her occupation. \"It fits you quite well I would say.\" Raelyn smiled satisfied as she tucked a stray strand of her hair behind her ear and she gestured for him to step up onto the stage. \"I need to hem your bottoms a bit for the correct length and the cuffs should come up a bit higher...\" She mused to herself  as her clever blue eyes flicked over his form as she paces around him. \"But more importantly, how do you feel? Do you need more space in an area? The inner lining shouldn't be irritating as I made the fabric myself, but I can exchange that as well if you find it too restricting or heavy.\" She offered as she paused in her inspection in front of him, taking out her notebook to make notes.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn walked away as he went to change and grabbed her pin cushion, strapping it onto her wrist carefully, making sure she had enough on hand. She stuck her notebook that was marked on Keph's clientele page into her apron for easy access. She turned around just as he walked out of the changing area and she gave a proud smile. She did have a good eye for these things. "}, "post-86218": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1540778153000", "message": "Did he more space in an area? Keph definitely more space in that uniform all-around, but again he supposed that would ruin the odd concept of fashion these people all had, so he simply shook his head, he only hoped that he'd manage to resist bursting out of the suit like maggot larvae hatching from within a carcass, luckily the fabric was comfortable enough that he likely wouldn't need to spend the night constantly scratching himself due to the constricting nature of this wear.\"This should be fine. Keph appreciates the help and will be here tomorrow before the date to pick it up. Is there anything else that needs to be taken care of?\"The young man tapped his foot, a bit restless as he had just recalled that he still needed to find a place to stay - hopefully that pass would allow him to still get back into the Citadel, he didn't want to spend another night sleeping in some alley, it wouldn't help him keep a good look and a good scent for tomorrow.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Did he more space in an area? Keph definitely more space in that uniform all-around, but again he supposed that would ruin the odd concept of fashion these people all had, so he simply shook his head, he only hoped that he'd manage to resist bursting out of the suit like maggot larvae hatching from within a carcass, luckily the fabric was comfortable enough that he likely wouldn't need to spend the night constantly scratching himself due to the constricting nature of this wear."}, "post-86246": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1540918071000", "message": "Raelyn nodded as she made a few more notes in her book as she held out her hand again to help him step down from the stage. \"I've collected pretty much all that I need from you. If you'll just take it off, I'll get to work altering and resizing it for you and it'll be ready for tomorrow.\" Raelyn mused with a smile as she gestured to the screen for him to change. \"Also if you'd like to dodge Dixie on your way out, I can show you to the back exit so you can walk out undisturbed.\" She mused as she tucked her pencil back behind her ear, giving him a bit of a smile. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn nodded as she made a few more notes in her book as she held out her hand again to help him step down from the stage. \"I've collected pretty much all that I need from you. If you'll just take it off, I'll get to work altering and resizing it for you and it'll be ready for tomorrow.\" Raelyn mused with a smile as she gestured to the screen for him to change. "}, "post-86713": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1541659472000", "message": "Keph smiled, then jogged behind the screen, he quickly got changed, haphazardly chucking the clothes the tailor had selected for him right over it on onto the floor, before getting changed back into his usual attire. He sighed, feeling plenty more comfortable in his baggy clothing compared to the constricting fashion of formalwear. He jumped out from behind the screen, ecstatically throwing out his arms! Right, that was all he needed, now to leave the tailor to her work!He was about to step out the door when she informed him of an alternate exit; yes, that other customer hadn't been very pleasant, so he gave her a thumbs up - avoiding trouble would probably be for the best.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph smiled, then jogged behind the screen, he quickly got changed, haphazardly chucking the clothes the tailor had selected for him right over it on onto the floor, before getting changed back into his usual attire. He sighed, feeling plenty more comfortable in his baggy clothing compared to the constricting fashion of formalwear. He jumped out from behind the screen, ecstatically throwing out his arms! Right, that was all he needed, now to leave the tailor to her work!"}, "post-86796": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1541803096000", "message": "Raelyn sighed as she saw the outfit she had handcrafted for a solid month, thrown onto the floor rather carelessly by the young man. She gave another resigned sigh as she stooped to carefully pick up the clothes and fold them over her arm as Keph gave her the thumbs up. Taking a deep breath for the gift of patience-she was nearly done with him yet- she gestured for him to follow her back out of the fitting room and down the hall past the stairs she had taken him up that led to the store front. She guided him down the hall passing the tidy room that was her bedroom and the small well stocked  kitchen before she led him to another set of stairs that led to another door out to her small backyard that would take him back out onto the streets of the Free City. \"If you take these stairs down and follow the path down out the gate, you'll be out on the streets once more. Just close the gate on your way out. You can come here tomorrow around noon and the outfit should be ready for you to take. You have a good day now hun.\" She said as she gestured for him to skedaddle as he wished. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn sighed as she saw the outfit she had handcrafted for a solid month, thrown onto the floor rather carelessly by the young man. She gave another resigned sigh as she stooped to carefully pick up the clothes and fold them over her arm as Keph gave her the thumbs up. Taking a deep breath for the gift of patience-she was nearly done with him yet- she gestured for him to follow her back out of the fitting room and down the hall past the stairs she had taken him up that led to the store front. "}, "post-87039": {"user": "Keph", "user_num": 1179, "timestamp": "1542363543000", "message": "Keph closely followed the tailor, eager to get out of her establishment, not that it wasn't nice, but there were places he still wanted to visit in the day! The walk was luckily quick, was the store wasn't overly large, and they did pass through a kitchen which allowed him to swiftly steal an apple from a bowl, something for the young drifter to snack on while he decided where and what he was even going to eat that day.\u00a0Once they were finally out in the backyard, he again gave her a thumbs up, waving and running off before she could even finish giving him directions on how to find the main street - he was sure he could find his way on his own, what was the worst that could happen, after all? The young man kept waving as he ran off, they would see each other, tomorrow, and then he'd finally be done with all of this fashion nonsense.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Keph closely followed the tailor, eager to get out of her establishment, not that it wasn't nice, but there were places he still wanted to visit in the day! The walk was luckily quick, was the store wasn't overly large, and they did pass through a kitchen which allowed him to swiftly steal an apple from a bowl, something for the young drifter to snack on while he decided where and what he was even going to eat that day.\u00a0"}, "post-87046": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1542406499000", "message": "Raelyn sighed as she watched him fly off out her door and out onto the street, her brow twitching slightly as she noticed an apple in his hand that had not been there before. She'd put that on his bill for certain. Walking down the stairs she closed the door behind him, locking it before she returned up the stairs to set the clothes on her work bench for her to alter for tomorrow. For a first customer that she wasn't familiar with, he wasn't... too terrible.At the very least he wasn't a woman to be wed. They were entirely inhuman to work with.\u00a0That thought did remind her of the woman that she had left untended, stewing in the store front. Deciding to leave things as they were for the time being, she hurried back down the steps, pulling her hair back into a ponytail as she went, tying it with a rogue ribbon. \"Sorry about that Darling. Have you simmered down now?\" She asked her voice lightly teasing and bouncing down to her as she walked down the steps and back up to Dixie, her hands coming to rest on her hips as she finished with her ponytail.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn sighed as she watched him fly off out her door and out onto the street, her brow twitching slightly as she noticed an apple in his hand that had not been there before. She'd put that on his bill for certain. Walking down the stairs she closed the door behind him, locking it before she returned up the stairs to set the clothes on her work bench for her to alter for tomorrow. For a first customer that she wasn't familiar with, he wasn't... "}, "post-87239": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1543123605000", "message": "Dixie had been sitting quietly, sipping her tea and wondering if smacking the bratty boy across the face would finally cause him to make a sound. When Raelyn appeared once more, teasing her, she sighed and drained the rest of her tea. She'd been in such a good mood, too, and now the boy had gone and irritated her. Not only that, but Raelyn had helped him with his clothes first, even though Dixie had very clearly gotten to the shop before he had. Why did life have to be so unfair all the time? All she'd wanted was to have her dress repaired, which should have been quick and painless. Why had Robert gone and insisted that she'd go here, anyways? Why couldn't she have gone to a different tailor? \"I suppose I've simmered down as much as I'm going to. I can't believe the nerve of some people, you know? And what business did he have with the Empress, anyway? It's not like he's anything special, and the Empress doesn't meet with just anyone, you know. What's so great about him, huh?\"She pouted and fumed, leaning back in the chair. If she ran into that boy again...she didn't know what she'd do. It definitely wouldn't be very nice, though.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie had been sitting quietly, sipping her tea and wondering if smacking the bratty boy across the face would finally cause him to make a sound. When Raelyn appeared once more, teasing her, she sighed and drained the rest of her tea. She'd been in such a good mood, too, and now the boy had gone and irritated her. Not only that, but Raelyn had helped him with his clothes first, even though Dixie had very clearly gotten to the shop before he had. Why did life have to be so unfair all the time? All she'd wanted was to have her dress repaired, which should have been quick and painless. Why had Robert gone and insisted that she'd go here, anyways? Why couldn't she have gone to a different tailor? "}, "post-87255": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1543192978000", "message": "Raelyn gave a soft sigh as she reached over to tuck a stray strand of hair out of Dixie's face before she gave her a half hearted shrug. \"We might never know really. I certainly don't as I've just moved in here. Your guess is as good as mine. I just wanted to be done with him and get him out of the shop as soon as possible before I had to pull you off of him. The way I see it, it's his and the Empress's business and we don't need to stick our noses in it. Honestly if she's interested in him for anything other than running errands, pardon me but I'd be a bit concerned about the figure in power... Though none of this probably matters to you all that much at the moment. You've still got that temper I see.\" She moved away from Dixie again going back over to her work bench, turning on the lamps that emitted a bright white light from the crystal that was implanted within the elegant cup of light fixture. She had to say... it was one of the things that did make this new shop worth all the trouble. The light was like it was dawn within the shop and that meant she could work through the night without worrying about making mistakes in the flickering candle light. Now, Raelyn was no empath but she could tell that most of the anger was directed at the rude runt that had just torn through her shop, but a good amount was also directed at her. She did still have a soft spot for her which led her to her next words. \"I'm really sorry about the whole situation though darling. Especially for making you wait and all. So this repair is on me alright? And if you're still upset with me, I'll design you a new gown that puts this one to shame. \" She said as she took out her glasses and tipped the lowest magnification over her right eye to assess the breakage properly, as one of the drawer behind her creaked open slowly- another grand addition to the store. \"Hm.... that looks like a B-7 and a C-2.\" She said and on cue, two spools of thread drifted over to her station, precisely matching the color of the gown, ready for use. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn gave a soft sigh as she reached over to tuck a stray strand of hair out of Dixie's face before she gave her a half hearted shrug. \"We might never know really. I certainly don't as I've just moved in here. Your guess is as good as mine. I just wanted to be done with him and get him out of the shop as soon as possible before I had to pull you off of him. The way I see it, it's his and the Empress's business and we don't need to stick our noses in it. Honestly if she's interested in him for anything other than running errands, pardon me but I'd be a bit concerned about the figure in power... Though none of this probably matters to you all that much at the moment. You've still got that temper I see.\" "}, "post-87730": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1544729953000", "message": "Dixie would continue to pout, but Raelyn's apology would placate her somewhat. Raelyn had always been a calm voice of reason when she was a child, usually managing to cause Dixie to settle down when she was upset. Besides, it there was truth to her words. The Empress' business was her own...although Dixie doubted that Raeyln had any idea how knowledgeable\u00a0she actually was about the Empress' interests. The prospect of a free repair was tempting, and she watched wide-eyed as the threads drifted across the room at the older woman's call. Magic had always fascinated her, and it seemed to be everywhere in the city.\"I suppose I can't complain about a free repair...but where did you learn to do that, Raelyn? The magic, I mean. Back home, nobody had any. The closest we got were traveling alchemists and artificers and witches in the woods. Out here, though, it seems like there's magic everywhere. Enclave mages walking the streets, potion shops, charm-sellers...even little things like your thread. How did you learn to do it? I never had any aptitude for it, myself. Not everyone does, they say. I don't mind though, I never really needed it back home. I do love seeing the magic everywhere, though. It's glamorous. There's always something going on, something new and exciting.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie would continue to pout, but Raelyn's apology would placate her somewhat. Raelyn had always been a calm voice of reason when she was a child, usually managing to cause Dixie to settle down when she was upset. Besides, it there was truth to her words. The Empress' business was her own...although Dixie doubted that Raeyln had any idea how "}, "post-87753": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1544742937000", "message": "Raelyn's brow cocked as the threads settled within reach as she began pinning the two torn parts of fabric together carefully, following along with the break. \"Magic has it's uses certainly and it is quite impressive, but it's finicky. And dangerous. I agree it's strange to see being used so flippantly.\" She said lightly as she straightened and crouched down to take out her needle set, lightly letting her fingertips move along them till she encountered just the right one for the job that wouldn't make the damage to the frayed edges worse. \"As for where I learned that little parlor trick, it's no story really. I'm not at all gifted or inclined to those arts. Just a passing magic man through the village had a rather tattered cloak and I restored it for him. We had a nice conversation and he enchanted my drawers and some of my tools to respond to my call.\" In a few fluid motions Raelyn took up the needle and threaded it carefully with the blue thread. She began at the bottom of the tear and began carefully working on the delicate fabric. \"I personally still can't make much more than a sweet appear from behind your ear darling.\" A soft smile curled it's way onto her lips though she didn't look up from her work, her hands moving quickly but precisely. \"You seem like you've adjusted fantastically well though if you're not only star struck by all the magic but also apparently familiar with the empress to know whom she would and wouldn't hang out with..?\" She trailed off, her brow cocking slightly.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn's brow cocked as the threads settled within reach as she began pinning the two torn parts of fabric together carefully, following along with the break. \"Magic has it's uses certainly and it is quite impressive, but it's finicky. And dangerous. I agree it's strange to see being used so flippantly.\" She said lightly as she straightened and crouched down to take out her needle set, lightly letting her fingertips move along them till she encountered just the right one for the job that wouldn't make the damage to the frayed edges worse. "}, "post-87896": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1545429969000", "message": "\"I suppose magic can be dangerous,\" Dixie mused, \"But it's still exciting. Life is boring without a little danger to it, don't you think? Besides, it's certainly safer here, with trained mages from the Enclave, than back home with the little backwater self-taught spell-casters.\"Dixie thought back to the mages she'd seen back home, shuddering. Most were either constantly drunk or unabashed scam artists, profiting off creating sparkles and facades without ever actually doing anything helpful. Here, at least, the mages seemed relatively professional. At Raelyn's question, she hesitated. How much did she want to tell? Clearly she couldn't reveal all of it.\"Well...Robert introduced me to the Empress. He works with her, you know. She...took a liking to me. We've, uh, talked a bit. Mhmm. Robert introduces me to a lot of people, you know. More than I'd ever imagined.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I suppose magic can be dangerous,\" Dixie mused, \"But it's still exciting. Life is boring without a little danger to it, don't you think? Besides, it's certainly safer here, with trained mages from the Enclave, than back home with the little backwater self-taught spell-casters.\""}, "post-87923": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1545546217000", "message": "Raelyn's eyebrows hiked up a few centimeters- honestly a bit surprised by Dixie's words. She had known in some form that her fussy cousin was a high ranking official in some capacity, but to be on casual speaking terms with the empress? Either he was bigger than she initially was lead to believe... or the empress had a taste for the low hanging fruit. She tried not to chuckle at her joke to herself as her hands moved fluidly, rapidly making progress down the dress. \"Stars above me, who would have thought little Dixie would be chatting up the empress one day. Times have changed since I braided your hair for you. But it's good to hear. I was a bit worried when I heard you'd gone off with Robert... But I'm glad to hear you're doing well. I still care about you and little Roxy quite a bit you know.\" She mused as she threaded the needle with a combination of the threads she had called over before, flicking a higher magnification over her eye now.  \"How is Roxy by the by? Do you two still keep in touch?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn's eyebrows hiked up a few centimeters- honestly a bit surprised by Dixie's words. She had known in some form that her fussy cousin was a high ranking official in some capacity, but to be on casual speaking terms with the empress? Either he was bigger than she initially was lead to believe... or the empress had a taste for the low hanging fruit. "}, "post-88000": {"user": "Iulia Iotapa", "user_num": 3099, "timestamp": "1546085871000", "message": "In the street outside Needle and Thread, Iulia Iotapa, brand new Investigator of the Guard, a member of Isra\u2019s Finest, consummate professional, proud of her even-headed equanimity, swore. It generally wasn\u2019t in her nature to curse like this, but the combination of nerves, weather, and the carriage that had just doused her in frigid muddy street water forced the words past her internal censor. She immediately swore again in anger at herself.Iulia had seen the carriage coming round the corner too fast, she saw the puddle, and yet still failed to move out of the way fast enough. Now she stood outside the Needle and Thread dripping wet and cold. The natty old jacket from her sister clung to her frame as the winter wind blew past. Her glasses, coated in flecks of mud and water, slip down her nose as she looks into the shop window and waves lamely. Careful to not drip too much onto the stoop outside the shop, the Investigator opens the door and calls in.\u201cI\u2019m so sorry. There was a carriage and a puddle and\u2026 I\u2019ll just come back later after I get cleaned up!\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "In the street outside "}, "post-88020": {"user": "Dixie Starr", "user_num": 2868, "timestamp": "1546130215000", "message": "Dixie smirked at Raelyn's shocked expression. Did she think it was really so shocking that she would have met the Empress? After a moment's consideration, Dixie decided that yes, it was in fact rather surprising. Who would have expected it of her? If only everyone from her home village could see her now.\"Roxy?\" she mused. \"Roxy is fine. I haven't seen her much lately, she's always so busy...but oh! I was supposed to go see her today. She works at her uncle Renalt's chocolate shop sometimes, when she's not out and about slaying monsters or whatever it is she does. I've heard that she's seeing someone new nowadays, someone secret...but don't tell Renalt that. Shh.\"She smirked, raising a finger to her lips conspiratorially before glancing out the window at the sun in the sky.\"Oh, is it afternoon already? I really have to go, I'm always late. Roxanne will be annoyed...but whatever. I'll tell her you were asking about her, ok? I'll come to pick up the dress later. Good-bye, Raelyn!\"How had the time slipped by? If only that bothersome child hadn't come by and delayed her, she would have been on time. Waving to Raelyn, she hurried from the shop and headed down the street.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dixie smirked at Raelyn's shocked expression. Did she think it was really so shocking that she would have met the Empress? After a moment's consideration, Dixie decided that yes, it was in fact rather surprising. Who would have expected it of her? If only everyone from her home village could see her now."}, "post-88043": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1546197927000", "message": "Raelyn blinked as Dixie suddenly left in a whirlwind, bustling out the door and away before she could so much as bid her farewell. She gave a heavy sigh before she shook her head a fond smile on her lips as she quickly finishing stitching up the gown. If only she had waited a few more moments, she could've had the gown already set and save the trip. But then again, that did mean she'd see the blonde again which made her smile. In a new city, some reminders of home were always appreciated.She had just begun folding the repaired gown up to set it in a box for Dixie when she heard the shop bell ring. Instinctively her eyes went up as her lips curved into a welcoming smile. \"Welcome to Needle and Thread, darling. How may I-\" She was cut off both by the woman's appearance and her interjection. The poor thing looked like a drowned cat! As if she could turn her away or let her scurry off. \"Nonsense! Forget that! Come in! Goodness me- you'll catch your death!\" She exclaimed as she quickly set the lid on the dress' box, whipping around to her shelves. \"Towels. I need a towel.\" She called and on cue the cubby with towels opened and a nice fluffy folded white towel floated out into Raelyn's hand as she hurried over to Iulia. Quickly she wrapped the towel around her head and shoulders, fluffing it a bit to dry her off. \"I have a bathroom upstairs you can clean up in if you'd like, but at least come in, dry off, and warm up.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn blinked as Dixie suddenly left in a whirlwind, bustling out the door and away before she could so much as bid her farewell. She gave a heavy sigh before she shook her head a fond smile on her lips as she quickly finishing stitching up the gown. If only she had waited a few more moments, she could've had the gown already set and save the trip. But then again, that did mean she'd see the blonde again which made her smile. In a new city, some reminders of home were always appreciated."}, "post-88103": {"user": "Iulia Iotapa", "user_num": 3099, "timestamp": "1546254885000", "message": "Iulia let herself be steered into the shop, smiling gratefully as the heat seeps back into her hands and face. After the cold and damp outside, this level of kindness buoyed her up immediately. \u201cThank you so much, friend. It\u2019s been quite the day.\u201dThe familiar sensation of pin pricks along the skin after being out in the cold for too long rushes through her. With the towel held close around her, Iulia carefully navigates through the store, taking huge steps to try and steer through without causing too much of a mess. Up the stairs she goes, taking them two at a time.In a few moments, Iulia returns, having left her coat, gloves, and boots to dry upstairs. Now she stands in stocking feet, long skirt, and simple blouse in the midst of the racks for cloth and clothing. The white towel serves as a makeshift short cape across her shoulders. A black Breton cap rests low down across her brow, causing her mussed hair to splay out slightly around the edges. The welcoming surroundings have done a number on her previous nerves, bringing Iulia out of her funk.\u201cLet\u2019s start again, shall we? I\u2019m Iulia Iotapa. Recently forced to have a career change and in need of new clothes for a uniform.\u201dA lopsided grin spread across the short woman\u2019s face.\u201cAnd my employer is willing to comp up to half of what I deem \u2018necessary\u2019.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Iulia let herself be steered into the shop, smiling gratefully as the heat seeps back into her hands and face. After the cold and damp outside, this level of kindness buoyed her up immediately. "}, "post-88116": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1546294316000", "message": "\"Oh well, we can certainly find a way around that.\" Raelyn hummed as she began pouring Iulia a piping hot cup of tea as she came back into the store proper. She had also set out a sugar bowl, honey, and some milk with small bowl of fruit and butter cookies. You could take the girl from the country but not the country from the girl. \"I could offer the full price, give you a discount but coincidentally not give your employer one.\" She mused, mostly kidding as she straightened and gave her a quick wink. \"But before we even talk about prices, how about you take a seat and warm yourself up with a nice cup of tea Ms. Iotapa. You can just call me Raelyn by the by.\" She said as she sat down on the opposite ottoman across the coffee table  that she had set the free cup on. She dropped in two sugars before pouring herself a cup as well.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Oh well, we can certainly find a way around that.\" Raelyn hummed as she began pouring Iulia a piping hot cup of tea as she came back into the store proper. She had also set out a sugar bowl, honey, and some milk with small bowl of fruit and butter cookies. You could take the girl from the country but not the country from the girl. "}, "post-88413": {"user": "Iulia Iotapa", "user_num": 3099, "timestamp": "1547046903000", "message": "\"Oh, tea sounds lovely. You\u2019re speaking my language, Raelyn.\" Iulia beams over the steaming cup as she cradled it in both hands. The ottoman has a pleasant sink to it, letting the sitter rest right into it. The wafting water vapor clings to the Inspector\u2019s glasses, causing her to sit back and wait for her vision to clear. In the meantime, she works her way slowly around one of the butter cookies.\u201cIs it just you, managing the shop, brewing the tea, and making these delicious cookies? Some days I\u2019m lucky to get the kettle on before noon.\u201dIt was nice, the tea and the warmth and the cookies. The oppressive reminder that tomorrow was her first day working for The Guard nestled back into the corner of Iulia\u2019s mind as she let her eyes wander around the shop. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Oh, tea sounds lovely. You\u2019re speaking my language, Raelyn.\" Iulia beams over the steaming cup as she cradled it in both hands. The ottoman has a pleasant sink to it, letting the sitter rest right into it. The wafting water vapor clings to the Inspector\u2019s glasses, causing her to sit back and wait for her vision to clear. In the meantime, she works her way slowly around one of the butter cookies."}, "post-88510": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1547250989000", "message": "Raelyn laughed softly as she leaned forward, pushing the cookies closer to her so she didn't have to reach for them. \"It is just me, yes. I've only just moved into the big city here. Maybe eventually I'll get some extra hands, but I think I'm alright on my own. I've always been an early riser. I also have a need to constantly be up to something, so lots gets done. All except for a moments rest that is.\" The seamstress smiled as she sat back and got comfortable as well, blowing softly on her tea before taking a satisfying sip of the tea. She set the cup back down in her lap. \"You do look like you've got quite a weight sitting on your shoulders though, darling. And I don't think it's the weight from the mud though it can weigh on you. Feel free to take a load off here and if you care to, I can lend an ear. If not just take the time to rest.\" The shop exuded the same warm and homely atmosphere as the woman before Iulia did. Though it was clear that most things were new from their polish, it felt lived in by the decor. Everything was folded and pristine or hung and pressed. Swaths and bolts of rich fabrics lined the shelves waiting to be used. A loom was tucked away in the corner, a rich maroon fabric in  the midst of being woven together. Tools also were hung and laid out within easy reach of the work table near what appeared to be a register. The scent of the tea intermingled with the scent of the shop that had it's own unique scent- a mingling of fresh linens, soft herbs, and a heady woody scent. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn laughed softly as she leaned forward, pushing the cookies closer to her so she didn't have to reach for them. \"It is just me, yes. I've only just moved into the big city here. Maybe eventually I'll get some extra hands, but I think I'm alright on my own. I've always been an early riser. I also have a need to constantly be up to something, so lots gets done. All except for a moments rest that is.\" "}, "post-88760": {"user": "Iulia Iotapa", "user_num": 3099, "timestamp": "1547979676000", "message": "Iulia looked back to Raelyn as she spoke. It was comforting how well the woman fit in with the rest of the shop. Everything had a place, including her, and all felt right in this small corner of the world. Seeing someone living in their exact right place in life was marvelous.\u201cWell, I\u2019ll admit that I\u2019ve been putting off coming to visit you. Not you personally, but coming in and getting set up with my uniform. This is the last thing I do before starting my position with the Isran Guard. They\u2019ve taken me on as an Inspector.\u201dWary of over-sharing, Iulia stares into the bottom of her tea cup for a beat to think out her next words. The last time she had opened up over a cup of tea, she lost her job.\u201cMy old employer let me go quite suddenly. I made some rather stupid mistakes. One of my highers up, we\u2019ll say, pulled a few strings and got me this new position. The pressure to make them know that choice wasn\u2019t in vain is quite real. I feel as though if I don\u2019t do well, I\u2019ll have let them down. I\u2019ll have let myself down too.\u201dIt felt good to verbalize her fears for just a moment. Was it enough? The slinking oily feelings of uncertainty seemed to have retreated deep within for the time being. Down comes the empty cup with a gentle clink. Iulia pops up to her feet and gives a little stretch, feeling refreshed. Emotions could wait, right?\u201cBut it looks like this is the best place to make a new start that I could have picked! You could craft a whole new woman in here. The Guard is fairly loose with uniform requirements, but I did get permission to adapt the costume a bit more than usual for my religious and personal preferences. How do you feel about waistcoats?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Iulia looked back to Raelyn as she spoke. It was comforting how well the woman fit in with the rest of the shop. Everything had a place, including her, and all felt right in this small corner of the world. Seeing someone living in their exact right place in life was marvelous."}, "post-88771": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1548017137000", "message": "Raelyn gave a bright smile as she set down her tea cup and pulled out a small notebook with a piece of charcoal for note taking. \"Personally, I love them. They don't suit me at all, but they look wonderful on women in my opinion. It helps magnify functionality and authority we already exude. I'd love to craft you one, especially if it'll give you the confidence you need in your new station.\" She hummed before she raised her right hand. \"Catalogue F-23-A and Catalogue M-23-A, please.\" She announced aloud. Moments later, two thick bound leather-backed books drifted out of their respective cubbies and over to her open palm, landing gently. Little divisions stuck out of the books with hurriedly scrawled labels on them and Raelyn grasped the one labeled 'waistcoats' and opened to the pages. Detailed sketches were inside of both faceless men and women in different types and styles of waist coats and trouser combinations. Raelyn turned them towards Iulia, straightening them carefully before she took up her notepad. \"These are some designs I have drawn up in the past, so you can get an idea of what is feasible to do. Of course, I will take in consideration your preferences as well. Whether it's a certain cut, fabric, or pattern.\" She said as she flipped to an open page and took up her charcoal. \"Now, tell me, what are you looking for. And take your time. I'm in no rush.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn gave a bright smile as she set down her tea cup and pulled out a small notebook with a piece of charcoal for note taking. \"Personally, I love them. They don't suit me at all, but they look wonderful on women in my opinion. It helps magnify functionality and authority we already exude. I'd love to craft you one, especially if it'll give you the confidence you need in your new station.\" She hummed before she raised her right hand. "}, "post-89206": {"user": "Iulia Iotapa", "user_num": 3099, "timestamp": "1550150830000", "message": "Iulia beams as Raelyn takes a few notes. The tailor\u2019s good tastes extend past tea and shop decor, it seems.\u201cAgreed. My old position was pretty much a boy\u2019s club situation. I\u2019m looking to stand out here a bit without being too obvious. I\u2019ve always been sort of plain looking in comparison to others, so clothing is where I\u2019ll get to make a statement. Investigator Iotapa invests in vests!\u201d she chuckles a bit at her admittedly awful pun.The illustrations, sketched so professionally, look up at Iulia as she leafs through the pages, stopping every now and again to admire one or two. She pauses on one page a bit longer than the others and taps it lightly.\u201cThis one speaks to me. If we could give it some inside pockets, it might just be coming home with me. And I even like the color! Not sure how I feel on the polka dotted necktie, maybe something crimson? Show off a bit of Isran pride that way.\u201dWas she having fun? Yes. Her last payment from the Foreign Service weighs heavily inside the small pouch at her belt. She can almost feel the coins burning a hole straight through their prison. If it comes down to it, skipping a few meals here and there would be well worth having clothes as spiffy as these. A few more moments are spent on the trousers. They look awfully convenient, and a good pair of legs inside of a well-fitted pair of trousers were always pleasant to see. \u201cAs for trousers, I\u2019m afraid skirts are more my speed. What do you have in the ankle length department?\u201d", "link_list": ["https://imgur.com/a/NsBw8PI"], "image_list": [], "html": "Iulia beams as Raelyn takes a few notes. The tailor\u2019s good tastes extend past tea and shop decor, it seems."}, "post-89224": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1550375495000", "message": "Raelyn smiled at that as she made some notes, carefully taking down the comments that Ms. Iotapa made. She loved when a client was particularly excited about what they were having commissioned. Their energy was often infectious and often made the task all the more enjoyable. Nothing was quite worse than having a reluctant customer. \"Inside pockets are definitely possible with this design, and I imagine, quite handy. And these are just my doodles so, of course anything can be changed and updated to suit your preferences.\" She mused as she called for another catalogue which she quickly opened and flipped through till she found what she was looking for sliding it over to show her the different styles of skirts all of appropriate length. Some patterned, some not, some flared, others form fitting. \"This here would be the selection of skirts I currently offer.\" She said as she took up her note pad again. \"If I might, I would recommend that if you'd like to go with a patterned vest you may want to match it with a simpler skirt so it does not become too overwhelming. And if you'd also like a patterned skirt, we can look into finding you another solid top that may go well with it. Variety is always good to have in one's wardrobe.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn smiled at that as she made some notes, carefully taking down the comments that Ms. Iotapa made. She loved when a client was particularly excited about what they were having commissioned. Their energy was often infectious and often made the task all the more enjoyable. Nothing was quite worse than having a reluctant customer. "}, "post-90568": {"user": "Iulia Iotapa", "user_num": 3099, "timestamp": "1558870430000", "message": "Iulia nods along as she continues to look through a few more pages of designs.\u201cI\u2019d like there to be enough room for me to run without getting too tripped up in the skirts. There will probably be a lot of running in this job. I like the idea of the solid colors for the skirts to keep the vest as the conversation piece.\u201dIn her head, the freshly minted Investigator ticks off the items she will be buying today. The waistcoat, three skirts...\u201cCould I also order two plain white blouses? I\u2019m afraid my old ones are far out of style, and getting a bit threadbare in the elbows.\u201d Iulia taps her left elbow as if to emphasize this last point.It had been far too easy to lose track of time, Iulia realized, conscious of the fact that she had spent the better part of the afternoon with Raelyn in her shop. The sun was already setting, and only a sparse handful of people walked by outside on the streets. Iulia hoped that she hadn\u2019t taken the pleasant seamstress away from better paying customers.\u201cThe last two things I need are two pairs of boots and some neckties. Would you happen know a cobbler who is as, hm, understanding of Isra\u2019s Finest as you seem to be?\u201dIulia gives the tailor a friendly wink.\u201cThank you again for being able to work with my budget. You\u2019ve definitely got a lifelong customer here.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Iulia nods along as she continues to look through a few more pages of designs."}, "post-90590": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1558930089000", "message": "Raelyn smiled pleasantly at that. She valued a regular customer far more than a one-off customer that just came for a quick stitch up. If there was a chance to have someone lovely like Ms.Iotapa stop by on a regular basis, it was not only profitable, but also benefited the soul. \"Of course! I understand how it is. I'm of the belief everyone should be able to wear whatever makes them the most comfortable. If for you, this is it, I am happy to provide you with it.\" She mused at that before she began to think about her other question. \"...Unfortunately though, I don't think I can be much help in the cobbler quest. I only just moved to this city recently  so I haven't had a chance to really check out the area as much as I'd like. But I will definitely keep an eye out and point you in the right direction if I see anything.\" She said as she made a few more notes in her book. \"The white blouses and the neck ties I will handle for you with no issue.\" Raelyn looked over Iulia's shoulder to see the sky darkening slowly as the sun sank lower in the sky. \"I'll just need your measurements and I'll be ready to get started. We can do them today or wait until the next time we meet to get them done, depending upon your rush.\" She offered with a smile, sitting up.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn smiled pleasantly at that. She valued a regular customer far more than a one-off customer that just came for a quick stitch up. If there was a chance to have someone lovely like Ms.Iotapa stop by on a regular basis, it was not only profitable, but also benefited the soul. "}, "post-94876": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1579933495000", "message": "The Needle and Thread had been in Fiona's list for a good long while as a place to stock up, but as soon as her good friend Robert had mentioned and recommended it, it jumped straight to the top of her list. A good thing too, as she had need for a new dress. Not for any special occasion, but after converting the bedroom of her work apartment into wardrobe, she had felt it was far too empty to call it such. To the shops she goes! Though a cold day, she wears a wonderful red dress that hugs her form splendidly, decorated with golden stitching that makes up a bouquet of flowers across the dress' mid section, and under her furry winter coat her shoulders stand bare. Even in the winter one can't ignore the call to fashion, and not when one has to keep up appearances like the wonderful Fiona Blythe. Even her hair and makeup are masterfully maintained, so much so it somes makes people wonder how long she takes to get it just right. The truth is not long, but her methods remain a secret to all, even her dear friend and business partner Yelan. She finally finds the shop and steps up into the front door, and opens it with a fluid grace. \"Hello?\" She asks as she steps in and removes her coat, finding herself quite warm indoors. She finds a peg for it quickly and hangs it up, intent on being a little while. She isn't the type to scout and leave. \"My name is Fiona Blythe, I'm looking for Raelyn?\" She asks as she approaches the counter with a warm smile. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The Needle and Thread had been in Fiona's list for a good long while as a place to stock up, but as soon as her good friend Robert had mentioned and recommended it, it jumped straight to the top of her list. A good thing too, as she had need for a new dress. Not for any special occasion, but after converting the bedroom of her work apartment into wardrobe, she had felt it was far too empty to call it such. To the shops she goes! "}, "post-94877": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1579935204000", "message": "Raelyn had been in the midst of organizing and tucking away the new shipment of threads she'd just had delivered when she heard the bell chime signaling the arrival of a client. Things had been going rather well, clients regularly coming in and requesting items. A good influx of publicity with every item she crafted, more and more people coming by to request her services. It was a bit overwhelming at times- it almost felt like she was the only tailor in the city- but she enjoyed the work, and she mostly enjoyed the clients- those who weren't too fussy that is. At the greeting she quickly tucked away the rest of the threads, making sure to keep them tidy and color-coordinated before she rose from behind the counter, a warm welcoming smile already on her face as she dusted off her hands and her apron. \"Well, you've found her, dear heart.\" She hummed as she turned around, flicking her silvery curls back out of her face. She paused for a moment taking in the beautiful woman standing in her shop before her eyes softened with warmth as she came around the counter to offer her a hand to shake. \"Miss Blythe, was it?\" She asked her violet eyes glimmering slightly.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn had been in the midst of organizing and tucking away the new shipment of threads she'd just had delivered when she heard the bell chime signaling the arrival of a client. Things had been going rather well, clients regularly coming in and requesting items. A good influx of publicity with every item she crafted, more and more people coming by to request her services. It was a bit overwhelming at times- it almost felt like she was the only tailor in the city- but she enjoyed the work, and she mostly enjoyed the clients- those who weren't too fussy that is. "}, "post-94878": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1579936242000", "message": "Fiona is internally delighted find that Raelyn is herself quite a looker, but then again she always found Robert to be quite handsome. Good looks must run in the family. She smiles warmly and takes Raelyn's hand, her own being soft and just firm enough in her shake, but then she lifts the woman's hand and plants a small kiss on the top of her hand. \"I must admit, I wasn't warned of your beauty, miss Raelyn,\" she says as she lets go. \"I will have to have words with your cousin about this. Oh, and just Fiona is fine.\" She drops into a little courtsey to finish off her introduction. \"Unless I'm mistaken about your cousin bring Robert Fletcher,\" she says as she stands up straight again. \"A dear friend of mine, he recommended your tailoring skills, and after seeing your work, I am greatly impressed. I just have to have my own.\" Her smile beams between her ruby lips, turning up the charm just a touch. \"If you have the time, of course. I can come back whenever it's more convenient for you, my lady.\" She noticed how some of the materials had been left by the wayside, fresh and uncut. It didn't take a genius to notice that a delivery must have just come in, and even though she hadn't spent any time working such a trade, even she understood how annoying it must be to have it sit for an extended period of time. Still, she remained hopeful, keeping her beautiful blue eyes trained on Raelyn's. She felt it almost unfair how well the Fletcher genetics seemed to carry but\u2026 well, who is she to judge? ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Fiona is internally delighted find that Raelyn is herself quite a looker, but then again she always found Robert to be quite handsome. Good looks must run in the family. "}, "post-94891": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1580010514000", "message": "Raelyn was a bit startled to say the least when Fiona pressed a kiss to the top of her hand, the tops of her cheekbones turning slightly rosy as she drew her hand back slowly, cradling it to her chest. The familiarity wasn't something she was exactly used to, but then, city folk always tended to be on the more eccentric side. When Fiona continued to compliment her- both on her appearance and skills though, her cheeks only darkened as she let out a soft cough turning away for a moment to take a deep breath. She wasn't typically easily flustered- she'd had several men attempt the same that this Fiona was and she'd merely dismissed them with a chuckle and a towel whip to those that were stubborn. Raelyn cleared her throat, apologizing softly, murmuring something about having something stuck in her throat as she gathered herself before she turned back to Fiona with a gentle smile. \" You've got quite the silver-tongue, sweetheart.\" She said simply, chuckling softly as she stepped back and gestured to a small couch and a coffee table. \"But I always have time, depending on what it is you would like made for you. I'd be happy to make you something- would you care to take a seat? I can make us some tea while we have a consultation.\" She offered, already moving to the kettle she had on some warming crystals that kept the water boiling. On the coffee table already were some freshly made blueberry scones, carefully stacked inside a glass container for ease of access. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn was a bit startled to say the least when Fiona pressed a kiss to the top of her hand, the tops of her cheekbones turning slightly rosy as she drew her hand back slowly, cradling it to her chest. The familiarity wasn't something she was exactly used to, but then, city folk always tended to be on the more eccentric side. When Fiona continued to compliment her- both on her appearance and skills though, her cheeks only darkened as she let out a soft cough turning away for a moment to take a deep breath. She wasn't typically easily flustered- she'd had several men attempt the same that this Fiona was and she'd merely dismissed them with a chuckle and a towel whip to those that were stubborn. "}, "post-94912": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1580088290000", "message": "Fiona had always delighted in flustering other women, and to see Raelyn follow in their footsteps brought a certain joy to her heart. Yep, she still has it! It had become something of a sport to Fiona, and had only served to make her even better at her less-than-illustrious job. \u201cA silver tongue comes with the job, Miss Fletcher,\u201d she says with a wide, but warm smile. \u201cWithout it, I probably wouldn\u2019t be able to afford the work of such incredible artisans such as yourself. I doubt I\u2019d have any tailored outfits at all without such a skill.\u201d As opposed to her entire wardrobe. It certainly paid to cater to the crowd she does, and it paid even more to steal from them, but she isn\u2019t about to go mentioning that. As directed, lady Blythe steps over to the coffee table, her heels clacking against the wooden boards of the shop floor, then gathers up her dress around here and sits. One of her long legs slips out of the dress as it crosses over the other, revealing her perfect, somewhat pale skin. \u201cAh, tea would be wonderful,\u201d she says before she leans over and takes one of the scones. How could she have forgotten breakfast? She picks at it happily, delighting in the taste. \u201cHome made?\u201d she asks. \u201cYou are a woman of many talents, Miss Fletcher. I certainly am impressed.\u201d Of course, on to matters of business. \u201cAs for what I\u2019d like?\u201d she muses. \u201cWell, I am open to suggestions. I\u2019ve seen your work, as I mentioned, and I\u2019d love to give you as much creative freedom as I can. I\u2019d like something I can work and be comfortable in, something that will draw the eye of everyone in the room and to give them a small taste, but leave the hungry eyes wanting more.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Fiona had always delighted in flustering other women, and to see Raelyn follow in their footsteps brought a certain joy to her heart. Yep, she still has it! It had become something of a sport to Fiona, and had only served to make her even better at her less-than-illustrious job. \u201cA silver tongue comes with the job, Miss Fletcher,\u201d she says with a wide, but warm smile. \u201cWithout it, I probably wouldn\u2019t be able to afford the work of such incredible artisans such as yourself. I doubt I\u2019d have any tailored outfits at all without such a skill.\u201d As opposed to her entire wardrobe. It certainly paid to cater to the crowd she does, and it paid even more to steal from them, but she isn\u2019t about to go mentioning that. "}, "post-94926": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1580096770000", "message": "Raelyn went about preparing the cups of tea- another of her own blends, she brewed specifically for clients. She listened attentively to what Fiona said, her mind working over the details of what she said curiously. There was a thought that twinged at the fringes of her mind, but she didn't allow to fully take form- it was quite rude to make an assumption of one's profession from a few simple words and their outward appearance. When the kettle gave a whistle she quickly took it off the crystals and poured two cups, getting out the fresh cream, sugar, and honey to put on a serving tray. \"Well Fiona,\" She started, careful to use her name as she'd been given. \"That certainly would be something I could do for you. But, if I knew your precise profession, it might help me a bit with more of the finer details. And how I might model them.\" She said as she came around to the table, setting the tray down near Fiona and handing her the cup of sweet but mellow smelling tea. \"Catalogue F-7-A and Sketchbook F-7-E, please.\" She called seemingly to no one, but moments later two thick leather-bound books floated over from the shelf behind the counter, coming to rest just in front of her. She opened the sketchbook first to a clear open page, pulling out a bit of charcoal as she wrote Fiona's first and last name on top before opening the other book. \"I very much doubt there is something that would not look good on you, and I do try to make every item of clothing, as comfortable as I can. On delicate works, I will make the fabric myself to ensure the best quality.\" She mused as she flipped through the pages of countless sketches. \"But again before all that, it might be prudent that you let me know just what it might be for- the trade it is so I don't recommend something like this-\" She stopped on a page with a sketch of a dress that was quite gaudy and frilly, with large bows scattered about. \"When in truth, I should be recommending something more like this.\" She flipped to yet another page with a far more form-fitting affair with a bodice, that accentuated the features but clearly kept them appropriately concealed. ", "link_list": ["https://pin.it/vwxicvmphroryk", "https://pin.it/xduftjb26v5nri"], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn went about preparing the cups of tea- another of her own blends, she brewed specifically for clients. She listened attentively to what Fiona said, her mind working over the details of what she said curiously. There was a thought that twinged at the fringes of her mind, but she didn't allow to fully take form- it was quite rude to make an assumption of one's profession from a few simple words and their outward appearance. "}, "post-94931": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1580099044000", "message": "Fiona sits comfortably and continues to pick at her scone while she watches Raelyn prepare the tea. When she isn\u2019t looking, her eyes dance along her form, admiring the other woman for her natural beauty, but her eyes come to land on her face as she turns. Ah! Tea! She graciously accepts it and takes a good sip. Its not one she\u2019s tried before, and she finds the composition most intriguing, perhaps something she should ask about for her own personal tea collection. Her eyes grow a little wider as the books float across the room, powered by magic no doubt. Still, she had never seen such a thing in person before, and the ease in which Raelyn shifts and moves them is to be commended. \u201cImpressive,\u201d she finally says, holding her warm cup in hand, the winter air still had them feeling a little chilly. She lets out a little chuckle at Raelyn\u2019s compliment, and puts a hand to her chest. \u201cThank you, miss Fletcher,\u201d she says with a warm smile. \u201cI do take very good care of myself, and I value comfort, so your efforts will never go unnoticed.\u201d She shifts in her seat, then leans over and looks over the dresses, but her slight sneer at the first one is all that needs to be said about it. Definitely not her style, and wouldn\u2019t go over all too well at the functions she attends, not for the desired effect, anyway.The second one makes her eyes light up though. \u201cOooooh~\u201d she coos, smiling ear to ear. \u201cOh yeah, this one is much more my style,\u201d she says, still admiring the dress and picturing herself in it. \u201cOh, and I\u2019m a courtesan,\u201d she finally says without looking up. \u201cBut don\u2019t let that dissuade you, I charge my clients quite a bit. I\u2019ll be able to pay for your services quite handsomely.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Fiona sits comfortably and continues to pick at her scone while she watches Raelyn prepare the tea. When she isn\u2019t looking, her eyes dance along her form, admiring the other woman for her natural beauty, but her eyes come to land on her face as she turns. Ah! Tea! She graciously accepts it and takes a good sip. Its not one she\u2019s tried before, and she finds the composition most intriguing, perhaps something she should ask about for her own personal tea collection. "}, "post-94960": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1580263740000", "message": "Raelyn let out a soft laugh at that as she started a new sketch in her book next to her name. \"Oh, sweetheart, I'm not worried. I'm very amendable on prices. So even if you were- say less well off, we could have come to some agreement.\" She continued as she worked on the silhouette of the dress. \"How will a man that is not dressed well get a job to pay for a suit without having one to begin with? Why should a maid be forced to wed in a dress unbefitting her immeasurable love because to do so would put them in a crippling debt? No, I try to be reasonable with whom I work with. And I may not make much on single items, but there is more value in a person that returns, than one that stops by just once.\" She explained idly before setting her book down on her lap to look back up at Fiona. \"But that is aside from the fact. That does give me a better idea of what you wish.\" She hummed as she reached over to the honey, twirling the wand before dribbling some in. \"Are you a fan of that design then? Would you like any alterations that you can see to it? And colors....Deep burgundy or a heady maroon would be gorgeous I think.\" Raelyn didn't seem at all taken aback by the admission of her profession, merely taking it in stride. She'd thought it might be something like that, but it never hurt to have confirmation.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Raelyn let out a soft laugh at that as she started a new sketch in her book next to her name. \"Oh, sweetheart, I'm not worried. I'm very amendable on prices. So even if you were- say less well off, we could have come to some agreement.\" She continued as she worked on the silhouette of the dress. \"How will a man that is not dressed well get a job to pay for a suit without having one to begin with? Why should a maid be forced to wed in a dress unbefitting her immeasurable love because to do so would put them in a crippling debt? No, I try to be reasonable with whom I work with. And I may not make much on single items, but there is more value in a person that returns, than one that stops by just once.\" She explained idly before setting her book down on her lap to look back up at Fiona. "}, "post-94963": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1580265631000", "message": "Fiona continues to watch Raelyn\u2019s charcoal strokes as she speaks, delighted in the design she\u2019s seeing. \u201cI think some wish I could do the same,\u201d she says, followed by a light chuckle. \u201cBut I think there\u2019s a stark difference between you reducing your prices and myself. Having said that, however, I admire your reasoning, they\u2019re quite noble reasons to do so.\u201d She\u2019s genuinely impressed by Raelyn\u2019s generosity, to reduce her prices like that given the circumstances. \u201cRegardless, I am ready, and more than willing to pay top coin for your work. I doubt my reasons of wanting to attract more clients would be worthy of such a change in price.\u201d She sits back and gives a little laugh before sipping on her tea. \u201cOh this is delightful,\u201d she says, feeling the warmth and taste of the tea once again. \u201cI\u2019ll have to get the supplier\u2019s name, but that\u2019ll come later.\u201d She looks from the tea and back to Raelyn, a smile across her ruby lips. \u201cQuite a fan. Its quite haute couture, while being revealing, but not overly so. I think it would be perfect for my line of work.\u201d She reaches up and twirls a finger through her dark brown hair. \u201cAnd I think a burgundy and maroon would match my hair quite well, wouldn\u2019t you think?\u201d  She takes another sip of her drink with delight. \u201cI\u2019m actually quite excited to work with you, Miss Fletcher,\u201d she says with her smile never faltering for a second. \u201cMy wardrobe needs filling, and if I continue to be as impressed as I am now, I think I know who shall fill it.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Fiona continues to watch Raelyn\u2019s charcoal strokes as she speaks, delighted in the design she\u2019s seeing. \u201cI think some wish I could do the same,\u201d she says, followed by a light chuckle. \u201cBut I think there\u2019s a stark difference between you reducing your prices and myself. Having said that, however, I admire your reasoning, they\u2019re quite noble reasons to do so.\u201d She\u2019s genuinely impressed by Raelyn\u2019s generosity, to reduce her prices like that given the circumstances. \u201cRegardless, I am ready, and more than willing to pay top coin for your work. I doubt my reasons of wanting to attract more clients would be worthy of such a change in price.\u201d "}, "post-95088": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1580617270000", "message": "\"Well, I can give you the supplier's name at this moment- Raelyn Fletcher.\" Raelyn mused with a small chuckle as she made some slight alterations to the design in her sketchbook compared to the one in her catalog. It would be difficult for one who didn't have a practiced eye, but she did make slight alterations to the patterns as she made a note of the color palette she wanted, and she shifted the alignment of the bodice as her eyes flicked from the page to Fiona's body. \"But it would be my honor and pleasure should you enjoy the product I create for you. And really Fiona, it's just Raelyn. Not even my mother went by Miss Fletcher.\" She said with a small chuckle as she brought the ribbon that acted as a bookmark to the page in her sketchbook before looking back up at Fiona with a warm smile. \"So I know you don't really have a time limit on this, but ideally, when would you like the piece done? And when would you be able to allow me to take your measurements? I have the time today, but if you need to step out, I'd be happy to take them another time.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Well, I can give you the supplier's name at this moment- Raelyn Fletcher.\" Raelyn mused with a small chuckle as she made some slight alterations to the design in her sketchbook compared to the one in her catalog. It would be difficult for one who didn't have a practiced eye, but she did make slight alterations to the patterns as she made a note of the color palette she wanted, and she shifted the alignment of the bodice as her eyes flicked from the page to Fiona's body. "}, "post-95178": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1580802186000", "message": "\u201cThen be sure to add a jar of this tea to my tab, would you?\u201d she asks with a warm smile once it's revealed that it's a home brew. How delightful! Being in the business she is, she can tell when someone is looking at her body, but this time it's for something else, at least from what she can tell. She puts the tea down and shifts a little in her seat, giving Raelyn a better understanding of her build and shape, knowing it would only make the dress more accurate. She peers over once again and smiles at the work being done, clearly impressed. \u201cI have a feeling I will enjoy it greatly, but we can discuss future orders later on, of course,\u201d Fiona says with a small smile, eyes gleaming with excitement. \u201cAh, very well then, Raelyn. If you don\u2019t mind me saying so, its such a beautiful name. Rolls off the tongue really quite well.\u201d She definitely preferred to say Raelyn over Miss Fletcher, mostly because Fletcher had taken on some other connotations, considering her friendship with Robert Fletcher. \u201cI want you to take your time,\u201d Fiona finally says, picking up her tea once more and taking a small sip. \u201cI don\u2019t like my outfits or accessories to be rushed, I much prefer them to be well crafted with as much care and attention to detail as possible, and most importantly I want you to enjoy your work as much as possible.\u201d Her smile is warm and genuine, much like her words. \u201cBesides, my clients prefer me out of my clothes anyway, so I can\u2019t say it's imperative to my job. Wearing such dresses is more for me than anyone else. I like feeling quite pretty.\u201d There\u2019s an understatement. She then goes over her schedule in her mind and\u2026 well there\u2019s nothing until just after supper when her appointments for the evening began, just two tonight, and Raelyn\u2019s shop would be closed by then. Her eyes go back to Raelyn\u2019s as she speaks once again. \u201cI have all the time in the world today,\u201d she says. \u201cAt least until this evening, but I would assume we\u2019d be done long before then. Shall we go ahead with the measurements?\u201d she asks before she stands, putting the tea down. \u201cIn private, right?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<br>\u201cThen be sure to add a jar of this tea to my tab, would you?\u201d she asks with a warm smile once it's revealed that it's a home brew. How delightful! Being in the business she is, she can tell when someone is looking at her body, but this time it's for something else, at least from what she can tell. She puts the tea down and shifts a little in her seat, giving Raelyn a better understanding of her build and shape, knowing it would only make the dress more accurate. She peers over once again and smiles at the work being done, clearly impressed. <br/><br/>\u201cI have a feeling I will enjoy it greatly, but we can discuss future orders later on, of course,\u201d Fiona says with a small smile, eyes gleaming with excitement. \u201cAh, very well then, Raelyn. If you don\u2019t mind me saying so, its such a beautiful name. Rolls off the tongue really quite well.\u201d She definitely preferred to say Raelyn over Miss Fletcher, mostly because Fletcher had taken on some other connotations, considering her friendship with Robert Fletcher. <br/><br/>\u201cI want you to take your time,\u201d Fiona finally says, picking up her tea once more and taking a small sip. \u201cI don\u2019t like my outfits or accessories to be rushed, I much prefer them to be well crafted with as much care and attention to detail as possible, and most importantly I want you to enjoy your work as much as possible.\u201d Her smile is warm and genuine, much like her words. \u201cBesides, my clients prefer me out of my clothes anyway, so I can\u2019t say it's imperative to my job. Wearing such dresses is more for me than anyone else. I like feeling quite pretty.\u201d There\u2019s an understatement. <br/><br/>She then goes over her schedule in her mind and\u2026 well there\u2019s nothing until just after supper when her appointments for the evening began, just two tonight, and Raelyn\u2019s shop would be closed by then. Her eyes go back to Raelyn\u2019s as she speaks once again. \u201cI have all the time in the world today,\u201d she says. \u201cAt least until this evening, but I would assume we\u2019d be done long before then. Shall we go ahead with the measurements?\u201d she asks before she stands, putting the tea down. \u201cIn private, right?\u201d <br/></br>"}, "post-95676": {"user": "Raelyn Fletcher", "user_num": 3156, "timestamp": "1582001579000", "message": "\"But of course. I wouldn't have you standing out in your delicates in my shop's window. Though I'm sure that would certainly bring customers in.\" Raelyn mused as she reached over, offering Fiona a hand to guide her. \"No, my setup is upstairs- coincidentally that is my workshop so if you ever want to come in for an update and I am not coming down, that is where I'll be. I can get a bit wrapped up in my projects and become oblivious to all else while I'm working.\" She said looking just a touch sheepish at that admission before shrugging slightly, guiding her up the stairs to the right of the desk she had found her behind when she'd first entered. Up the little flight of stairs, it came out into a hallway with four doors- one to the left that had a handpainted sign hanging on it proclaiming- 'Home Sweet Home', the door on the front wall closest to the left had no designation the door to the right middle was deemed the 'Workshop' and finally the door to the right was wide open. High windows lit the room with sunlight but were high enough that no one could see into the room from the building across or from below with the curtains drawn on the lower windows. There was a curtained area off to the corner presumably for the privacy of devesting and in the center of the room there was a pedestal that was likely where she did her measurements and when the final product was ready, the final alterations would be made. Mirrors were stuck up on all of the walls giving every possible angle to whoever stood in the center of the room. \"Here we are. If you could just divest yourself of your outer layers to your comfort level, I can get your measurements.\" She hummed as she hurried about to pull over a stepping stool for her to get up to the pedestal without reaching. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"But of course. I wouldn't have you standing out in your delicates in my shop's window. Though I'm sure that would certainly bring customers in.\" Raelyn mused as she reached over, offering Fiona a hand to guide her. \"No, my setup is upstairs- coincidentally that is my workshop so if you ever want to come in for an update and I am not coming down, that is where I'll be. I can get a bit wrapped up in my projects and become oblivious to all else while I'm working.\" She said looking just a touch sheepish at that admission before shrugging slightly, guiding her up the stairs to the right of the desk she had found her behind when she'd first entered. "}, "post-95681": {"user": "Fiona Blythe", "user_num": 3339, "timestamp": "1582006842000", "message": "The courtesan chuckles as she delicately takes Raelyn\u2019s hand in helping her up. \u201cOh, perhaps,\u201d she says with a warm smile. \u201cBut it would be a little odd to have a naked woman in your window when your business is to clothe them, wouldn\u2019t it?\u201d She can\u2019t deny it won\u2019t being in a few customers, but the right customers is another thing all together. \u201cBut please, do go on. I\u2019m excited to see your workspace, it must be quite something.\u201d The only workspaces she\u2019s ultimately familiar with is her bed and the bench she uses for her thieving tools. She can\u2019t help but wonder what a tailor\u2019s workspace looks like. She follows up the stairs with graceful steps, happy to be out of the viewing eye of the public. It may be because when she\u2019s usually going upstairs to undress its for something a little more exciting, and that excitement must carry over. She doesn\u2019t pay much mind to the doors she isn\u2019t directed to, except the home sweet home door, which she assumed is Raelyn\u2019s own home for all the good that information would do her. Instead, she focuses on the one door that matters, the one Raelyn herds her into. \u201cI\u2019m impressed,\u201d she says after a brief moment of examination around the room. \u201cYou\u2019ve done well to protect the privacy of your customers. It certainly shows that you know what you\u2019re doing, if not for your expert craftsmanship, of course.\u201d She takes a few steps into the room and smiles brightly, even doing a little twirl. \u201cQuite the space! I feel as if I\u2019ll be seeing plenty of this room while you\u2019re working on my new wardrobe. Although, I understand having the client around while you work could be a bit too much pressure, if not I can lead yout to it. I\u2019d quite like to see you work sometime, you see.\u201d When directed to the curtain, she\u2019s more than happy to oblige. She steps behind and begins undressing, starting with her dress of course. Thank goodness for good tailors who actually provide the means to hang one\u2019s dress without it getting creased or crumpled, as she gently places her lovely clothes on a mannequin set up behind the curtain. Is that what she looks like in that dress? Well, no wonder she gets looks. Snug in all the right places\u2026 Then she rolls her eyes, realising she\u2019s checking out a mannequin wearing her dress. Damn it, Blythe\u2026 Afrer a few more moments, she steps out from behind the curtain wearing\u2026 well, nothing at all. She had slipped out of her dress and high heeled shoes, and the dress she wore didn\u2019t permit to wear a brazier. Her underwear\u2026 well, she was asked to divest to her comfort level, and considering her work this is more than comfortable. Besides, she preferred not to wear them generally, only when she hadn\u2019t the intention of working. They generally got in the way. \u201cShall we begin?\u201d she asks, walking towards the pedestal. She steps up and looks into the mirrors, checking herself out for a moment. \u201cAh\u2026 another year older yet I haven\u2019t aged a day,\u201d she says with a bright smile. It had been her birthday just a week or two prior, and she still felt like she had the same body she had when she first started out. Now on the pedestal, Rae got a view many would pay for. Smooth, perfect skin without a single blemish, a well maintained, toned physique from all her time running around, a generously sized bust that satisfies many a fantasy, and a pair of long, sculpted legs that end in a perfect rear end, the appeal of which is only matched on the other side. Well maintained, well trimmed, and well preserved in all the right places. She must command quite the price. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The courtesan chuckles as she delicately takes Raelyn\u2019s hand in helping her up. \u201cOh, perhaps,\u201d she says with a warm smile. \u201cBut it would be a little odd to have a naked woman in your window when your business is to clothe them, wouldn\u2019t it?\u201d She can\u2019t deny it won\u2019t being in a few customers, but the right customers is another thing all together. \u201cBut please, do go on. I\u2019m excited to see your workspace, it must be quite something.\u201d The only workspaces she\u2019s ultimately familiar with is her bed and the bench she uses for her thieving tools. She can\u2019t help but wonder what a tailor\u2019s workspace looks like. "}}